Utah statutes.
64-13a-14.   Hearings.
(1)  Pursuant to Section 64-13a-2, the Department of Corrections shall provide
an opportunity for persons or organizations affected by the establishment of
new industry programs or product lines to appear and present testimony
concerning the plans and activities of the Division of Correctional
Industries.
(2)  No new industrial, agricultural, or service enterprise which involves
gross annual sales of more than $100,000 may be established unless and until a
hearing concerning the enterprise has been held by the department.
(3)  The department shall take into consideration the effect of a proposed
enterprise on Utah industry and may not approve the establishment of the
enterprise if it would have a comprehensive and substantial adverse impact on
a particular Utah business, enterprise, or industry.
